Utah statutes.
34-46-202.   Use of information collected in initial selection process.

(1) (a)  An employer may not:

(i)  use information about an applicant obtained through an initial selection process for a purpose other than to determine whether or not the employer will hire the applicant as an employee; or

(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (2), provide information about an applicant obtained through an initial selection process to a person other than the employer.

(b)  A use prohibited under this Subsection (1) includes:

(i)  marketing;

(ii)  profiling;

(iii)  reselling of the information; or

(iv)  a similar use.

(2)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, an employer may provide information:

(a)  as required by law;

(b)  to a government entity for the purpose of:

(i)  determining eligibility for a government service, benefit, or program; or

(ii)  participating in a government service, benefit, or program;

(c)  if the applicant applies for another position with the employer; or

(d)  if the applicant becomes an employee and the information is used for one or more of the following, that is also applied to other employees in a similar position:

(i)  a performance review; or

(ii)  a promotion application.

